Washington statutes.
RCW 36.62.140

Board of trustees—Qualifications of trustees.

No person shall be eligible for appointment as a trustee who holds or has held during the period of two years immediately prior to appointment any salaried office or position in any office, department, or branch of the government which established or maintained the hospital.

[ 1984 c 26 s 11; 1963 c 4 s 36.62.140. Prior: 1931 c 139 s 2; RRS s 6090-10.]